Florida, session 2026, HB1233.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
117
118 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
119 20.23, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
120 20.23 Department of Transportation.—There is created a
121 Department of Transportation which shall be a decentralized
122 agency.
123 (3) The Legislature finds that the transportation industry
124 is critical to the economic future of this state and that the
125 competitiveness of the industry in this state depends upon the
Page 5 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
126 development and maintenance of a qualified workforce and
127 cutting-edge research and innovation. The Legislature further
128 finds that the transportation industry in this state has varied
129 and complex workforce needs ranging from technical and
130 mechanical training to continuing education opportunities for
131 workers with advanced degrees and certifications. The timely
132 need also exists for coordinated research and innovation efforts
133 to promote emerging technologies and innovative construction
134 methods and tools and to address alternative funding mechanisms.
135 It is the intent of the Legislature to support programs designed
136 to address the workforce development needs of the state's
137 transportation industry.
138 (c) The institute shall report to the department and shall
139 be composed of members from the University of Florida, the
140 Florida State University Indian River State College, the
141 University of Central Florida, the University of South Florida,
142 and Florida International University. The department shall
143 select a member to serve as the administrative lead of the
144 institute. The department shall assess the performance of the
145 administrative lead periodically to ensure accountability and
146 assess the attainment of performance goals.
147 Section 2. Paragraph (h) of subsection (4) of section
148 260.0142, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
149 260.0142 Florida Greenways and Trails Council;
150 composition; powers and duties.—
Page 6 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
151 (4) The duties of the council include the following:
152 (h) Make recommendations for updating and revising the
153 implementation plan for the Florida Greenways and Trails System,
154 including, but not limited to, recommendations for
155 prioritization of regionally significant trails within the
156 Florida Shared-Use Nonmotorized Trail Network. The council shall
157 meet within 90 days after the Department of Transportation
158 submits its report pursuant to s. 339.81(8) to update its
159 recommendations for prioritization of regionally significant
160 trails within the network.
161 Section 3. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
162 311.14, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
163 311.14 Seaport planning.—
164 (2) Each port shall develop a strategic plan with a 10-
165 year horizon. Each plan must include the following:
166 (b) An infrastructure development and improvement
167 component that identifies all projected infrastructure
168 improvements within the plan area which require improvement,
169 expansion, or development in order for a port to attain a
170 strategic advantage for competition with national and
171 international competitors. This component must provide
172 strategies for obtaining and maintaining critical infrastructure
173 resources for the port and its tenants. Such strategies must
174 include long-term contracts, rights of first refusal regarding
175 the sale or lease of property storing such resources, and
Page 7 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
176 contingency plans for obtaining such resources. For purposes of
177 this paragraph, the term "critical infrastructure resources"
178 includes, but is not limited to, access to electricity, fuel,
179 and water resources.
180
181 To the extent feasible, the port strategic plan must be
182 consistent with the local government comprehensive plans of the
183 units of local government in which the port is located. Upon
184 approval of a plan by the port's board, the plan shall be
185 submitted to the Florida Seaport Transportation and Economic
186 Development Council.
187 Section 4. Section 311.26, Florida Statutes, is created to
188 read:
189 311.26 Florida Seaport Maritime Industrial Base.—The
190 Department of Transportation shall coordinate with the
191 Department of Commerce and the ports listed in s. 311.09, the
192 United States Department of Commerce, and the United States
193 Department of War to identify and prioritize key maritime
194 components in the supply chain which are essential to
195 strengthening and expanding this state's maritime industrial
196 base. The ports listed in s. 311.09 shall support projects
197 evaluated by the Department of Transportation, which shall
198 directly support the construction, maintenance, and
199 modernization of both commercial vessels, including cargo
200 vessels, and vessels designed for national defense. Projects
Page 8 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
201 shall be evaluated based on the return on invested capital, job
202 creation, and contribution to the economic competitiveness of
203 this state and based on support for the national security
204 interests of the United States. Additional considerations shall
205 include the anticipated enhancement of this state's commercial
206 maritime capabilities.
207 Section 5. Subsections (66) through (112) of section
208 316.003, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (67)
209 through (113), respectively, subsections (59) and (65) are
210 amended, and a new subsection (66) is added to that section, to
211 read:
212 316.003 Definitions.—The following words and phrases, when
213 used in this chapter, shall have the meanings respectively
214 ascribed to them in this section, except where the context
215 otherwise requires:
216 (59) PERSONAL DELIVERY DEVICE.—An electrically powered
217 device that:
218 (a) Is operated on sidewalks, and crosswalks, bicycle
219 lanes, bicycle paths, or shoulders on streets, roadways, or
220 highways, excluding limited access facilities, and intended
221 primarily for transporting property;
222 (b) Has a weight that does not exceed the maximum weight
223 established by Department of Transportation rule;
224 (c) Operates at Has a maximum speed of 10 miles per hour
225 on sidewalks and crosswalks and 20 miles per hour on bicycle
Page 9 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
226 lanes, bicycle paths, or shoulders on streets, roadways, or
227 highways, excluding limited access facilities; and
228 (d) Is equipped with technology to allow for operation of
229 the device with or without the active control or monitoring of a
230 natural person.
231
232 A personal delivery device is not considered a vehicle unless
233 expressly defined by law as a vehicle. A mobile carrier is not
234 considered a personal delivery device. The Department of
235 Transportation may adopt rules to implement this subsection.
236 (65) PRIVATE ROAD OR DRIVEWAY.—Except as otherwise
237 provided in paragraph (91)(b) paragraph (90)(b), any privately
238 owned way or place used for vehicular travel by the owner and
239 those having express or implied permission from the owner, but
240 not by other persons.
241 (66) PROHIBITED ZONE OF OPERATION.—
242 (a) The Florida Shared-use Nonmotorized Trail Network
243 created in s. 339.81.
244 (b) A theme park or entertainment complex as defined in s.
245 509.013(9).
246 (c) A state correctional institution as defined in s.
247 944.02.
248 (d) A county detention facility, county residential
249 probation center, municipal detention facility, or reduced
250 custody housing area as defined on s. 951.23(1).
Page 10 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
251 (e) A detention center or facility as defined in s.
252 985.03.
253 Section 6. Paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of section
254 316.008, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (c) is
255 added to that subsection, to read:
256 316.008 Powers of local authorities.—
257 (7)
258 (b)1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2., a personal
259 delivery device may be operated on sidewalks, crosswalks,
260 bicycle lanes, bicycle paths, or shoulders on streets, roadways,
261 or highways, excluding limited access facilities, and a mobile
262 carrier may be operated on sidewalks and crosswalks within a
263 county or municipality when such use is permissible under
264 federal law. This subparagraph paragraph does not restrict a
265 county or municipality from otherwise adopting regulations for
266 the safe operation of personal delivery devices and mobile
267 carriers in a manner consistent with this chapter.
268 2. A personal delivery device may not be operated on the
269 Florida Shared-Use Nonmotorized Trail Network created under s.
270 339.81 or components of the Florida Greenways and Trails System
271 created under chapter 260 or in state forests, state parks, or
272 wildlife management areas, or in any prohibited zone of
273 operation.
274 (c) A county or municipality may not enact, impose, levy,
275 collect, or enforce:
Page 11 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
276 1. An operating fee for personal delivery devices, except
277 as expressly authorized by general law; or
278 2. An advertising regulation that restricts, prohibits,
279 conditions, or otherwise limits commercial advertising on
280 personal delivery devices.
281 Section 7. Subsection (2) of section 316.187, Florida
282 Statutes, is amended to read:
283 316.187 Establishment of state speed zones.—
284 (2)(a) The maximum allowable speed limit on limited access
285 highways is 80 70 miles per hour.
286 (b) The maximum allowable speed limit on any other highway
287 that which is outside an urban area of 5,000 or more persons and
288 that which has at least four lanes divided by a median strip is
289 70 65 miles per hour.
290 (c) The Department of Transportation is authorized to set
291 such maximum and minimum speed limits for travel over other
292 roadways under its authority as it deems safe and advisable, not
293 to exceed as a maximum limit 70 60 miles per hour.
294 Section 8. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 316.2071,
295 Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (5) is added to
296 that section, to read:
297 316.2071 Personal delivery devices and mobile carriers.—
298 (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
299 a personal delivery device may operate on sidewalks, crosswalks,
300 bicycle lanes, bicycle paths, or shoulders on streets, roadways,
Page 12 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
301 or highways, excluding limited access facilities, and a or
302 mobile carrier may operate on sidewalks and crosswalks, subject
303 to s. 316.008(7)(b). Such A personal delivery device or mobile
304 carrier operating on a sidewalk or crosswalk has all the rights
305 and duties applicable to a pedestrian under the same
306 circumstances. A, except that the personal delivery device or
307 mobile carrier may must not unreasonably interfere with
308 pedestrians, bicyclists, and motor vehicles or traffic and must
309 yield the right-of-way to pedestrians on the sidewalk or
310 crosswalk.
311 (3) A personal delivery device and a mobile carrier may
312 not:
313 (a) Operate on a sidewalk, crosswalk, bicycle lane, or
314 shoulder on a street, roadway, or highway, excluding a limited
315 access facility, unless the personal delivery device or mobile
316 carrier meets minimum criteria established by the Department of
317 Transportation public highway except to the extent necessary to
318 cross a crosswalk.
319 (b) Operate on a sidewalk, or crosswalk, bicycle lane,
320 bicycle path, or shoulder on a street, roadway, or highway,
321 excluding a limited access facility, unless a human who is an
322 agent of the personal delivery device operator is capable of
323 actively controlling and or monitoring the navigation and
324 operation of the personal delivery device or a mobile carrier
325 owner remains within 25 feet of the mobile carrier.
Page 13 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
326 (c) Transport hazardous materials as defined in s.
327 316.003.
328 (d) For mobile carriers, transport persons or animals.
329 (e) Operate in a prohibited zone of operation.
330 (5) The Department of Transportation may adopt rules to
331 implement this section.
332 Section 9. Subsection (9) of section 318.14, Florida
333 Statutes, is amended to read:
334 318.14 Noncriminal traffic infractions; exception;
335 procedures.—
336 (9) Any person who does not hold a commercial driver
337 license or commercial learner's permit and who is cited while
338 driving a noncommercial motor vehicle for an infraction under
339 this section other than a violation of s. 316.183(2), s.
340 316.187, or s. 316.189 when the driver exceeds the posted limit
341 by 30 miles per hour or more, s. 320.0605, s. 320.07(3)(a) or
342 (b), s. 322.065, s. 322.15(1), s. 322.61, or s. 322.62 may, in
343 lieu of a court appearance, elect to attend in the location of
344 his or her choice within this state a basic driver improvement
345 course approved by the Department of Highway Safety and Motor
346 Vehicles. In such a case, adjudication must be withheld, any
347 civil penalty that is imposed by s. 318.18(3) must be reduced by
348 18 percent, and points, as provided by s. 322.27, may not be
349 assessed. However, a person may not make an election under this
350 subsection if the person has made an election under this
Page 14 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
351 subsection in the preceding 12 months or has made more than
352 eight elections under this subsection in the preceding 20 years.
353 A person may not make more than eight elections within his or
354 her lifetime under this subsection. The requirement for
355 community service under s. 318.18(8) is not waived by a plea of
356 nolo contendere or by the withholding of adjudication of guilt
357 by a court.
358 Section 10. Section 320.06, Florida Statutes, is amended
359 to read:
360 320.06 Registration certificates and, license plates;, and
361 validation stickers generally.—
362 (1)(a) Upon the receipt of an initial application for
363 registration and payment of the appropriate license tax and
364 other fees required by law, the department shall assign to the
365 motor vehicle a registration license number consisting of
366 letters and numerals or numerals and issue to the owner or
367 lessee a certificate of registration and one registration
368 license plate, unless two plates are required for display by s.
369 320.0706, for each vehicle so registered.
370 (b)1. Registration license plates bearing a graphic symbol
371 and the alphanumeric system of identification shall be issued
372 for a 10-year period. At the end of the 10-year period, upon
373 renewal, the plate shall be replaced. The department shall
374 extend the scheduled license plate replacement date from a 6-
375 year period to a 10-year period. The fee for such replacement is
Page 15 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
376 $28, $2.80 of which shall be paid each year before the plate is
377 replaced, to be credited toward the next $28 replacement fee.
378 The fees shall be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating
379 Trust Fund. A credit or refund may not be given for any prior
380 years' payments of the prorated replacement fee if the plate is
381 replaced or surrendered before the end of the 10-year period,
382 except that a credit may be given if a registrant is required by
383 the department to replace a license plate under s.
384 320.08056(8)(a). With each license plate, a validation sticker
385 shall be issued showing the owner's birth month, license plate
386 number, and the year of expiration or the appropriate renewal
387 period if the owner is not a natural person. The validation
388 sticker shall be placed on the upper right corner of the license
389 plate. The license plate and validation sticker shall be issued
390 based on the applicant's appropriate renewal period. The
391 registration period is 12 months, the extended registration
392 period is 24 months, and all expirations occur based on the
393 applicant's appropriate registration period. Rental vehicles
394 taxed pursuant to s. 320.08(6)(a) and rental trucks taxed
395 pursuant to s. 320.08(3)(a)-(c) and (4)(a)-(f) (4)(a)-(d) may
396 elect a permanent registration period, provided payment of the
397 appropriate license taxes and fees occurs annually.
398 2. Beginning July 1, 2024, A vehicle registered in
399 accordance with the International Registration Plan must be
400 issued a license plate for a 3-year period. At the end of the 3-
Page 16 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
401 year period, upon renewal, the license plate must be replaced.
402 Each license plate must include a validation sticker showing the
403 month of expiration. A cab card denoting the declared gross
404 vehicle weight for each apportioned jurisdiction must be issued
405 annually. The fee for an original or a renewal cab card is $28,
406 which must be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust
407 Fund. If the license plate is damaged or worn, it may be
408 replaced at no charge by applying to the department and
409 surrendering the current license plate.
410 3. In order to retain the efficient administration of the
411 taxes and fees imposed by this chapter, the 80-cent fee increase
412 in the replacement fee imposed by chapter 2009-71, Laws of
413 Florida, is negated as provided in s. 320.0804.
414 (c) Registration license plates equipped with validation
415 stickers subject to the registration period are valid for not
416 more than 12 months and expire at midnight on the last day of
417 the registration period. A registration license plate equipped
418 with a validation sticker subject to the extended registration
419 period is valid for not more than 24 months and expires at
420 midnight on the last day of the extended registration period. A
421 registration license plate equipped with a validation sticker
422 subject to a permanent registration period is permanently valid
423 but shall become void if appropriate license taxes and fees are
424 not paid annually. For each registration period after the one in
425 which the metal registration license plate is issued, and until
Page 17 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
426 the license plate is required to be replaced, the renewal shall
427 be recorded electronically a validation sticker showing the
428 month and year of expiration shall be issued upon payment of the
429 proper license tax amount and fees and is valid for not more
430 than 12 months. For each extended registration period occurring
431 after the one in which the metal registration license plate is
432 issued and until the license plate is required to be replaced,
433 the renewal shall be recorded electronically a validation
434 sticker showing the year of expiration shall be issued upon
435 payment of the proper license tax amount and fees and is valid
436 for not more than 24 months. For each permanent registration
437 period occurring after the one in which the metal registration
438 license plate is issued and until the license plate is required
439 to be replaced, the renewal shall be recorded electronically a
440 validation sticker showing a permanent registration period shall
441 be issued upon payment of the proper license tax amount and fees
442 and is permanently valid but shall become void if the proper
443 license taxes and fees are not paid annually. When license
444 plates equipped with validation stickers are issued in any month
445 other than the owner's birth month or the designated
446 registration period for any other motor vehicle, the effective
447 date shall reflect the birth month or month and the year of
448 renewal. However, when a license plate or validation sticker is
449 issued for a period of less than 12 months, the applicant shall
450 pay the appropriate amount of license tax and the applicable fee
Page 18 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
451 under s. 320.14 in addition to all other fees. Validation
452 stickers issued for vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(6)(a), for
453 any company that owns 250 vehicles or more, or for semitrailers
454 taxed under the provisions of s. 320.08(5)(a), for any company
455 that owns 50 vehicles or more, may be placed on any vehicle in
456 the fleet so long as the vehicle receiving the validation
457 sticker has the same owner's name and address as the vehicle to
458 which the validation sticker was originally assigned.
459 (2) The department shall provide the several tax
460 collectors and license plate agents with the necessary number of
461 validation stickers.
462 (2)(3)(a) Registration license plates must be made of
463 metal specially treated with a retroreflection material, as
464 specified by the department. The registration license plate is
465 designed to increase nighttime visibility and legibility and
466 must be at least 6 inches wide and not less than 12 inches in
467 length, unless a plate with reduced dimensions is deemed
468 necessary by the department to accommodate motorcycles, mopeds,
469 similar smaller vehicles, or trailers. Validation stickers must
470 also be treated with a retroreflection material, must be of such
471 size as specified by the department, and must adhere to the
472 license plate. The registration license plate must be imprinted
473 with a combination of bold letters and numerals or numerals, not
474 to exceed seven digits, to identify the registration license
475 plate number. The license plate must be imprinted with the word
Page 19 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
476 "Florida" at the top and the name of the county in which it is
477 sold, the state motto, or the words "Sunshine State" at the
478 bottom. Apportioned license plates must have the word
479 "Apportioned" at the bottom, and license plates issued for
480 vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(3)(d), (4)(m) or (n), (5)(b) or
481 (c), or (14) must have the word "Restricted" at the bottom.
482 License plates issued for vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(12)
483 must be imprinted with the word "Florida" at the top and the
484 word "Dealer" at the bottom unless the license plate is a
485 specialty license plate as authorized in s. 320.08056.
486 Manufacturer license plates issued for vehicles taxed under s.
487 320.08(12) must be imprinted with the word "Florida" at the top
488 and the word "Manufacturer" at the bottom. License plates issued
489 for vehicles taxed under s. 320.08(5)(d) or (e) must be
490 imprinted with the word "Wrecker" at the bottom. Any county may,
491 upon majority vote of the county commission, elect to have the
492 county name removed from the license plates sold in that county.
493 The state motto or the words "Sunshine State" shall be printed
494 in lieu thereof. A license plate issued for a vehicle taxed
495 under s. 320.08(6) may not be assigned a registration license
496 number, or be issued with any other distinctive character or
497 designation, that distinguishes the motor vehicle as a for-hire
498 motor vehicle.
499 (b) An additional fee of 50 cents shall be collected on
500 each motor vehicle registration or motor vehicle renewal
Page 20 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
501 registration issued in this state in order for all license
502 plates and validation stickers to be fully treated with
503 retroreflection material. The fee shall be deposited into the
504 Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund.
505 (3)(4) The corporation organized under chapter 946 may
506 manufacture license plates, validation stickers, and decals, as
507 well as temporary tags, disabled hang tags, vessel decals, and
508 fuel use decals, for the Department of Highway Safety and Motor
509 Vehicles as provided in this chapter and chapter 327. The
510 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles is not required
511 to obtain competitive bids in order to contract with the
512 corporation.
513 (4)(5) The department may conduct a pilot program to
514 evaluate the designs, concepts, and technologies for alternative
515 license plates. For purposes of the pilot program, the
516 department shall investigate the feasibility and use of
517 alternative license plate technologies and the long-term cost
518 impact to the consumer. The pilot program shall be limited to
519 license plates that are used on government-owned motor vehicles
520 as described in s. 320.0655. Such license plates are exempt from
521 the requirements in paragraph (2)(a) (3)(a).
522 (5)(6) All license plates issued pursuant to this chapter
523 are the property of this the state.
524 Section 11. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
525 330.41, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (e) is added
Page 21 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
526 to that subsection, to read:
527 330.41 Unmanned Aircraft Systems Act.—
528 (3) REGULATION.—
529 (c)1. Except as otherwise expressly provided, a political
530 subdivision may not withhold issuance of a business tax receipt,
531 development permit, or other conditional use approval to a drone
532 delivery service on a commercial property or enact or enforce an
533 ordinance or resolution that prohibits a drone delivery
534 service's operation based on the location of its drone port,
535 notwithstanding part II of chapter 163 and chapter 205. A
536 political subdivision may enforce minimum setback and
537 landscaping regulations that are generally applicable to
538 permitted uses in the drone port site's zoning district. This
539 paragraph may not be construed to authorize a political
540 subdivision to require additional landscaping as a condition of
541 approval of a drone port.
542 2. A drone delivery service may not operate or provide
543 delivery services within a prohibited zone of operation.
544 (e) The addition of a drone delivery service within the
545 parking area of a commercial property does not reduce the number
546 of parking spaces for the purpose of meeting applicable minimum
547 parking requirements.
548 Section 12. Subsection (1) of section 332.001, Florida
549 Statutes, is amended to read:
550 332.001 Aviation; powers and duties of the Department of
Page 22 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
551 Transportation.—
552 (1) It shall be the duty, function, and responsibility of
553 the Department of Transportation to plan and direct investments
554 in airport systems in this state to facilitate the efficient
555 movement of passengers and cargo and to continuously improve the
556 experience for the flying public and the supply chain of this
557 state's businesses. In carrying out this duty and
558 responsibility, the department may assist and advise, cooperate,
559 and coordinate with the federal, state, local, or private
560 organizations and individuals in planning such systems of
561 airports.
562 Section 13. Subsection (10) is added to section 332.006,
563 Florida Statutes, to read:
564 332.006 Duties and responsibilities of the Department of
565 Transportation.—The Department of Transportation shall, within
566 the resources provided to the department:
567 (10) Coordinate with commercial service airports in this
568 state to review policies and programs of the United States
569 Transportation Security Administration, including programs for
570 veterans and active duty members of the United States Armed
571 Forces and their families, to increase the efficiency of
572 passenger screening and the overall customer service experience
573 of the flying public.
574 Section 14. Subsections (4), (5), and (6) of section
575 332.0075, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5),
Page 23 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
576 (6), and (7), respectively, and a new subsection (4) is added to
577 that section to read:
578 332.0075 Commercial service airports; transparency and
579 accountability; penalty.—
580 (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, commercial
581 service airports must provide methods for obtaining and
582 maintaining critical infrastructure resources for the airport,
583 its tenants, and the traveling public. Such strategies must
584 include long-term contracts and rights of first refusal
585 regarding the sale of and contingency plans for such resources.
586 For purposes of this subsection, the term "critical
587 infrastructure resources" includes, but is not limited to,
588 access to electricity, fuel, and water resources.
589 Section 15. Subsections (1) through (37) of section
590 334.03, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (2)
591 through (38), respectively, present subsection (29) is amended,
592 and a new subsection (1) is added to that section, to read:
593 334.03 Definitions.—When used in the Florida
594 Transportation Code, the term:
595 (1) "Advanced air mobility corridor connection point"
596 means any land area or transportation facility, including any
597 airspace, designated by the department as suitable to support
598 the efficient movement of people and goods by use as a
599 connection point for advanced air mobility.
600 (30)(29) "Transportation corridor" means any advanced air
Page 24 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
601 mobility corridor connection point or any land area designated
602 by the state, a county, or a municipality which is between two
603 geographic points and which area is used or suitable for the
604 movement of people and goods by one or more modes of
605 transportation, including areas necessary for management of
606 access and securing applicable approvals and permits.
607 Transportation corridors, other than advanced air mobility
608 corridor connection points, shall contain, but are not limited
609 to, the following:
610 (a) Existing publicly owned rights-of-way;
611 (b) All property or property interests necessary for
612 future transportation facilities, including rights of access,
613 air, view, and light, whether public or private, for the purpose
614 of securing and utilizing future transportation rights-of-way,
615 including, but not limited to, any lands reasonably necessary
616 now or in the future for securing applicable approvals and
617 permits, borrow pits, drainage ditches, water retention areas,
618 rest areas, replacement access for landowners whose access could
619 be impaired due to the construction of a future facility, and
620 replacement rights-of-way for relocation of rail and utility
621 facilities.
622 Section 16. Subsections (5), (20), and (21) of section
623 334.044, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsections (40),
624 (41), and (42) are added to that section, to read:
625 334.044 Powers and duties of the department.—The
Page 25 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
626 department shall have the following general powers and duties:
627 (5) To purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire property and
628 materials, including the purchase of promotional items as part
629 of public information and education campaigns for the promotion
630 of environmental management, scenic highways, traffic and train
631 safety awareness, commercial motor vehicle safety, workforce
632 development, transportation economic development opportunities
633 electric vehicle use and charging stations, autonomous vehicles,
634 advanced air mobility, and context classification for electric
635 vehicles and autonomous vehicles; to purchase, lease, or
636 otherwise acquire equipment and supplies; and to sell, exchange,
637 or otherwise dispose of any property that is no longer needed by
638 the department.
639 (20) To operate and maintain research facilities
640 designated by the department, to conduct and enter into
641 contracts and agreements for compensation for conducting
642 research by the department and private entities studies, and to
643 collect data necessary for the improvement of the state
644 transportation system.
645 (21) To conduct and enter into contracts and agreements
646 for research and demonstration projects relative to innovative
647 transportation technologies.
648 (40) To coordinate with local governmental entities to
649 review grant applications for federal funding for transportation
650 projects that impact or may impact state-owned rights-of-way,
Page 26 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
651 roads, bridges, or limited access facilities.
652 (41) To coordinate with and provide assistance to local
653 governmental entities in the development and review of
654 applications for federal transportation funding.
655 (42) Notwithstanding s. 20.255(9), to serve as the point
656 of contact for statewide topographic aerial light detection and
657 ranging (LiDAR) procurement and cost sharing related to
658 statewide geographic information systems and geospatial data
659 sharing. The department may provide these services to other
660 state and local agencies by entering into an interagency
661 agreement consistent with chapter 216. Notwithstanding any other
662 law, including any charter provision, ordinance, statute, or
663 special law, all state and local agencies conducting programs or
664 exercising powers relating to topographic aerial LiDAR may enter
665 into interagency agreements consistent with chapter 216 with the
666 department for the provision by the department of topographic
667 aerial LiDAR procurement and cost-sharing services, and to
668 delegate such authority to conduct programs or exercise powers
669 relating to topographic aerial LiDAR procurement and cost-
670 sharing services to the department pursuant to such interagency
671 agreements. The department may adopt rules pursuant to ss.
672 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this subsection.
673 Section 17. Subsection (3) is added to section 334.63,
674 Florida Statutes, to read:
675 334.63 Project concept studies and project development and
Page 27 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
676 environment studies.—
677 (3)(a) It is the policy of this state that nonpecuniary
678 factors are not considerations in taxpayer-funded project
679 development and environmental studies. To the extent such
680 nonpecuniary factors are a requirement of federal law or as a
681 condition of receipt of federal transportation funding, a
682 governmental entity must include the following in any
683 publication, document, report, presentation, webpage, or digital
684 application:
685 1. A written statement that federal law requires such
686 considerations as part of the project development and
687 environmental study in question and a reference to such federal
688 law.
689 2. The amount of taxpayer funding required to make such
690 considerations, including the approximate increase in costs
691 related to nonpecuniary factors.
692 3. The estimated cost increase for all project phases for
693 the overall recommended project when nonpecuniary factors are
694 considered.
695 (b) For purposes of this subsection, the term
696 "nonpecuniary factor" includes any of the following:
697 1. Considerations related to social justice, including
698 diversity, equity, and inclusion or the placement of highways or
699 transportation facilities having a disproportionate effect or
700 impact on a specific demographic;
Page 28 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
701 2. Considerations related to environmental justice,
702 including the social or cultural environment being impacted by
703 the actions;
704 3. Sociocultural effect evaluations; or
705 4. Additional considerations related to climate alarmism,
706 including any benchmark, standard, threshold, goal, or
707 requirement related to emissions, motor vehicle fuel sources,
708 decarbonization, and net-zero policies. For purposes of this
709 subparagraph, the term "net-zero policies" means achieving a
710 balance between the total amount of greenhouse gases released
711 into the atmosphere and the amount removed. The term does not
712 include standard reviews related to section 4(f) requirements
713 outlined in 49 U.S.C. s. 303 and 23 U.S.C. s. 138.
714 Section 18. Paragraphs (a) and (i) of subsection (3) and
715 paragraphs (b), (d), and (r) of subsection (7) of section
716 337.401, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
717 337.401 Use of right-of-way for utilities subject to
718 regulation; permit; fees.—
719 (3)(a) Because of the unique circumstances applicable to
720 providers of communications services, including, but not limited
721 to, the circumstances described in paragraph (e) and the fact
722 that federal and state law require the nondiscriminatory
723 treatment of providers of telecommunications services, and
724 because of the desire to promote competition among providers of
725 communications services, it is the intent of the Legislature
Page 29 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
726 that municipalities and counties treat providers of
727 communications services in a nondiscriminatory and competitively
728 neutral manner when imposing rules or regulations governing the
729 placement or maintenance of communications facilities in the
730 public roads or rights-of-way. Rules or regulations imposed by a
731 municipality or county relating to providers of communications
732 services placing or maintaining communications facilities in its
733 roads or rights-of-way must be generally applicable to all
734 providers of communications services, taking into account the
735 distinct engineering, construction, operation, maintenance,
736 public works, and safety requirements of the provider's
737 facilities, and, notwithstanding any other law, may not require
738 a provider of communications services to apply for or enter into
739 an individual license, franchise, or other agreement with the
740 municipality or county as a condition of placing or maintaining
741 communications facilities in its roads or rights-of-way. In
742 addition to other reasonable rules or regulations that a
743 municipality or county may adopt relating to the placement or
744 maintenance of communications facilities in its roads or rights-
745 of-way under this subsection or subsection (7), a municipality
746 or county may require a provider of communications services that
747 places or seeks to place facilities in its roads or rights-of-
748 way to register with the municipality or county. To register, a
749 provider of communications services may be required only to
750 provide its name; the name, address, and telephone number of a
Page 30 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
751 contact person for the registrant; the number of the
752 registrant's current certificate of authorization issued by the
753 Florida Public Service Commission, the Federal Communications
754 Commission, or the Department of State; a statement of whether
755 the registrant is a pass-through provider as defined in
756 subparagraph (6)(a)1.; the registrant's federal employer
757 identification number; and any required proof of insurance or
758 self-insuring status adequate to defend and cover claims. A
759 municipality or county may not require a registrant to renew a
760 registration more frequently than every 5 years but may require
761 during this period that a registrant update the registration
762 information provided under this subsection within 90 days after
763 a change in such information. A municipality or county may not
764 require the registrant to provide an inventory of communications
765 facilities, maps, locations of such facilities, or other
766 information by a registrant as a condition of registration,
767 renewal, or for any other purpose; provided, however, that a
768 municipality or county may require as part of a permit
769 application that the applicant identify at-grade communications
770 facilities within 50 feet of the proposed installation location
771 for the placement of at-grade communications facilities. A
772 municipality or county may not require a provider to pay any
773 fee, cost, or other charge for registration or renewal thereof.
774 A municipality or county may not require a provider to locate or
775 perform a survey of any facilities other than those of the
Page 31 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
776 provider or to perform a survey of any right-of-way boundary as
777 a condition of a permit. If the owner of a facility fails to
778 locate its facilities as required by chapter 556, a provider
779 must use reasonable care and detection equipment or other
780 acceptable means to avoid damaging existing underground
781 facilities. A municipality or county may not in any way limit
782 the number of permits issued to a provider, including by project
783 size or by limiting the number of open permits or applications,
784 provided that the permit is closed within 45 days after the
785 provider completes the work. A municipality or county may
786 require the submission or maintenance of a bond or other
787 financial instrument as provided in this section but may not
788 require a cash deposit or other escrow, payment, or exaction as
789 a condition of issuing a permit. It is the intent of the
790 Legislature that the placement, operation, maintenance,
791 upgrading, and extension of communications facilities not be
792 unreasonably interrupted or delayed through the permitting or
793 other local regulatory process. Except as provided in this
794 chapter or otherwise expressly authorized by chapter 202,
795 chapter 364, or chapter 610, a municipality or county may not
796 adopt or enforce any ordinance, regulation, or requirement as to
797 the placement or operation of communications facilities in a
798 right-of-way by a communications services provider authorized by
799 state or local law to operate in a right-of-way; regulate any
800 communications services; or impose or collect any tax, fee,
Page 32 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
801 cost, charge, or exaction for the placement of communications
802 facilities or the provision of communications services over the
803 communications services provider's communications facilities in
804 a right-of-way.
805 (i) Except as expressly provided in this section, this
806 section does not modify the authority of municipalities and
807 counties to levy the tax authorized in chapter 202 or the duties
808 of providers of communications services under ss. 337.402-
809 337.404. This section does not apply to building permits, pole
810 attachments, or private roads, private easements, and private
811 rights-of-way, or building permits unrelated to the placement of
812 communications facilities.
813 (7)
814 (b) As used in subsections (3)-(9) this subsection, the
815 term:
816 1. "Antenna" means communications equipment that transmits
817 or receives electromagnetic radio frequency signals used in
818 providing wireless services.
819 2. "Applicable codes" means uniform building, fire,
820 electrical, plumbing, or mechanical codes adopted by a
821 recognized national code organization or local amendments to
822 those codes enacted solely to address threats of destruction of
823 property or injury to persons, and includes the National
824 Electric Safety Code and the 2017 edition of the Florida
825 Department of Transportation Utility Accommodation Manual.
Page 33 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
826 3. "Applicant" means a person who submits an application
827 and is a wireless provider.
828 4. "Application" means a request submitted by an applicant
829 to an authority for a permit to collocate small wireless
830 facilities, or to place a new utility pole used to support a
831 small wireless facility, or place other communications
832 facilities. An authority's permit application form or process
833 must include all required permissions, however designated,
834 required by the authority to grant a permit to place
835 communications facilities, including, but not limited to, right-
836 of-way occupancy, building permits, electrical permits, and
837 historic review.
838 5. "Authority" means a county or municipality having
839 jurisdiction and control of the rights-of-way of any public
840 road. The term does not include the Department of
841 Transportation. Rights-of-way under the jurisdiction and control
842 of the department are excluded from this subsection.
843 6. "Authority utility pole" means a utility pole owned by
844 an authority in the right-of-way. The term does not include a
845 utility pole owned by a municipal electric utility, a utility
846 pole used to support municipally owned or operated electric
847 distribution facilities, or a utility pole located in the right-
848 of-way within:
849 a. A retirement community that:
850 (I) Is deed restricted as housing for older persons as
Page 34 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
851 defined in s. 760.29(4)(b);
852 (II) Has more than 5,000 residents; and
853 (III) Has underground utilities for electric transmission
854 or distribution.
855 b. A municipality that:
856 (I) Is located on a coastal barrier island as defined in
857 s. 161.053(1)(b)3.;
858 (II) Has a land area of less than 5 square miles;
859 (III) Has less than 10,000 residents; and
860 (IV) Has, before July 1, 2017, received referendum
861 approval to issue debt to finance municipal-wide undergrounding
862 of its utilities for electric transmission or distribution.
863 7. "Collocate" or "collocation" means to install, mount,
864 maintain, modify, operate, or replace one or more wireless
865 facilities on, under, within, or adjacent to a wireless support
866 structure or utility pole. The term does not include the
867 installation of a new utility pole or wireless support structure
868 in the public rights-of-way.
869 8. "FCC" means the Federal Communications Commission.
870 9. "Micro wireless facility" means a small wireless
871 facility having dimensions no larger than 24 inches in length,
872 15 inches in width, and 12 inches in height and an exterior
873 antenna, if any, no longer than 11 inches.
874 10. "Small wireless facility" means a wireless facility
875 that meets the following qualifications:
Page 35 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
876 a. Each antenna associated with the facility is located
877 inside an enclosure of no more than 6 cubic feet in volume or,
878 in the case of antennas that have exposed elements, each antenna
879 and all of its exposed elements could fit within an enclosure of
880 no more than 6 cubic feet in volume; and
881 b. All other wireless equipment associated with the
882 facility is cumulatively no more than 28 cubic feet in volume.
883 The following types of associated ancillary equipment are not
884 included in the calculation of equipment volume: electric
885 meters, concealment elements, telecommunications demarcation
886 boxes, ground-based enclosures, grounding equipment, power
887 transfer switches, cutoff switches, vertical cable runs for the
888 connection of power and other services, and utility poles or
889 other support structures.
890 11. "Utility pole" means a pole or similar structure that
891 is used in whole or in part to provide communications services
892 or for electric distribution, lighting, traffic control,
893 signage, or a similar function. The term includes the vertical
894 support structure for traffic lights but does not include a
895 horizontal structure to which signal lights or other traffic
896 control devices are attached and does not include a pole or
897 similar structure 15 feet in height or less unless an authority
898 grants a waiver for such pole.
899 12. "Wireless facility" means equipment at a fixed
900 location which enables wireless communications between user
Page 36 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
901 equipment and a communications network, including radio
902 transceivers, antennas, wires, coaxial or fiber-optic cable or
903 other cables, regular and backup power supplies, and comparable
904 equipment, regardless of technological configuration, and
905 equipment associated with wireless communications. The term
906 includes small wireless facilities. The term does not include:
907 a. The structure or improvements on, under, within, or
908 adjacent to the structure on which the equipment is collocated;
909 b. Wireline backhaul facilities; or
910 c. Coaxial or fiber-optic cable that is between wireless
911 structures or utility poles or that is otherwise not immediately
912 adjacent to or directly associated with a particular antenna.
913 13. "Wireless infrastructure provider" means a person who
914 has been certificated under chapter 364 to provide
915 telecommunications service or under chapter 610 to provide cable
916 or video services in this state, or that person's affiliate, and
917 who builds or installs wireless communication transmission
918 equipment, wireless facilities, or wireless support structures
919 but is not a wireless services provider.
920 14. "Wireless provider" means a wireless infrastructure
921 provider or a wireless services provider.
922 15. "Wireless services" means any services provided using
923 licensed or unlicensed spectrum, whether at a fixed location or
924 mobile, using wireless facilities.
925 16. "Wireless services provider" means a person who
Page 37 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
926 provides wireless services.
927 17. "Wireless support structure" means a freestanding
928 structure, such as a monopole, a guyed or self-supporting tower,
929 or another existing or proposed structure designed to support or
930 capable of supporting wireless facilities. The term does not
931 include a utility pole, pedestal, or other support structure for
932 ground-based equipment not mounted on a utility pole and less
933 than 5 feet in height.
934 (d) An authority may require a registration process and
935 permit fees in accordance with subsection (3). An authority
936 shall accept applications for permits and shall process and
937 issue permits subject to the following requirements:
938 1. An authority may not directly or indirectly require an
939 applicant to perform services unrelated to the collocation for
940 which approval is sought, such as in-kind contributions to the
941 authority, including reserving fiber, conduit, or pole space for
942 the authority.
943 2. An applicant may not be required to provide more
944 information to obtain a permit than is necessary to demonstrate
945 the applicant's compliance with applicable codes for the
946 placement of small wireless facilities in the locations
947 identified in the application. An applicant may not be required
948 to provide inventories, maps, or locations of communications
949 facilities in the right-of-way other than as necessary to avoid
950 interference with other at-grade or aerial facilities located at
Page 38 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
951 the specific location proposed for a small wireless facility or
952 within 50 feet of such location.
953 3. An authority may not:
954 a. Require the placement of small wireless facilities on
955 any specific utility pole or category of poles;
956 b. Require the placement of multiple antenna systems on a
957 single utility pole;
958 c. Require a demonstration that collocation of a small
959 wireless facility on an existing structure is not legally or
960 technically possible as a condition for granting a permit for
961 the collocation of a small wireless facility on a new utility
962 pole except as provided in paragraph (i);
963 d. Require compliance with an authority's provisions
964 regarding placement of communications facilities, including
965 small wireless facilities or a new utility pole used to support
966 a small wireless facility, in rights-of-way under the control of
967 the department unless the authority has received a delegation
968 from the department for the location of the small wireless
969 facility or utility pole, or require such compliance as a
970 condition to receive a permit that is ancillary to the permit
971 for collocation of a small wireless facility, including an
972 electrical permit;
973 e. Require a meeting before filing an application;
974 f. Require direct or indirect public notification or a
975 public meeting for the placement of communication facilities in
Page 39 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
976 the right-of-way;
977 g. Limit the size or configuration of a small wireless
978 facility or any of its components, if the small wireless
979 facility complies with the size limits in this subsection;
980 h. Prohibit the installation of a new utility pole used to
981 support the collocation of a small wireless facility if the
982 installation otherwise meets the requirements of this
983 subsection; or
984 i. Require that any component of a small wireless facility
985 be placed underground except as provided in paragraph (i); or
986 j. Require compliance with an authority's provisions
987 regarding the placement of communications facilities, including
988 small wireless facilities or a new utility pole used to support
989 a small wireless facility, in rights-of-way not owned and
990 controlled by the authority or public utility easements that are
991 not within an area owned and controlled by the authority unless
992 a permit delegation agreement exists between the authority and
993 the owner of the rights-of-way or easement.
994 4. Subject to paragraph (r), an authority may not limit
995 the placement, by minimum separation distances, of small
996 wireless facilities, utility poles on which small wireless
997 facilities are or will be collocated, or other at-grade
998 communications facilities. However, within 14 days after the
999 date of filing the application, an authority may request that
1000 the proposed location of a small wireless facility be moved to
Page 40 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1001 another location in the right-of-way and placed on an
1002 alternative authority utility pole or support structure or
1003 placed on a new utility pole. The authority and the applicant
1004 may negotiate the alternative location, including any objective
1005 design standards and reasonable spacing requirements for ground-
1006 based equipment, for 30 days after the date of the request. At
1007 the conclusion of the negotiation period, if the alternative
1008 location is accepted by the applicant, the applicant must notify
1009 the authority of such acceptance and the application shall be
1010 deemed granted for any new location for which there is agreement
1011 and all other locations in the application. If an agreement is
1012 not reached, the applicant must notify the authority of such
1013 nonagreement and the authority must grant or deny the original
1014 application within 90 days after the date the application was
1015 filed. A request for an alternative location, an acceptance of
1016 an alternative location, or a rejection of an alternative
1017 location must be in writing and provided by electronic mail.
1018 5. An authority shall limit the height of a small wireless
1019 facility to 10 feet above the utility pole or structure upon
1020 which the small wireless facility is to be collocated. Unless
1021 waived by an authority, the height for a new utility pole is
1022 limited to the tallest existing utility pole as of July 1, 2017,
1023 located in the same right-of-way, other than a utility pole for
1024 which a waiver has previously been granted, measured from grade
1025 in place within 500 feet of the proposed location of the small
Page 41 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1026 wireless facility. If there is no utility pole within 500 feet,
1027 the authority shall limit the height of the utility pole to 50
1028 feet.
1029 6. The installation by a communications services provider
1030 of a utility pole in the public rights-of-way, other than a
1031 utility pole used to support a small wireless facility, is
1032 subject to authority rules or regulations governing the
1033 placement of utility poles in the public rights-of-way.
1034 7. Within 14 days after receiving an application, an
1035 authority must determine and notify the applicant by electronic
1036 mail as to whether the application is complete. If an
1037 application is deemed incomplete, the authority must
1038 specifically identify the missing information. An application is
1039 deemed complete if the authority fails to provide notification
1040 to the applicant within 14 days.
1041 8. An application must be processed on a nondiscriminatory
1042 basis. A complete application is deemed approved if an authority
1043 fails to approve or deny the application within 60 days after
1044 receipt of the application. If an authority does not use the 30-
1045 day negotiation period provided in subparagraph 4., the parties
1046 may mutually agree to extend the 60-day application review
1047 period. The authority shall grant or deny the application at the
1048 end of the extended period. A permit issued pursuant to an
1049 approved application shall remain effective for 1 year unless
1050 extended by the authority.
Page 42 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1051 9. An authority must notify the applicant of approval or
1052 denial by electronic mail. An authority shall approve a complete
1053 application unless it does not meet the authority's applicable
1054 codes. If the application is denied, the authority must specify
1055 in writing the basis for denial, including the specific code
1056 provisions on which the denial was based, and send the
1057 documentation to the applicant by electronic mail on the day the
1058 authority denies the application. The applicant may cure the
1059 deficiencies identified by the authority and resubmit the
1060 application within 30 days after notice of the denial is sent to
1061 the applicant. The authority shall approve or deny the revised
1062 application within 30 days after receipt or the application is
1063 deemed approved. The review of a revised application is limited
1064 to the deficiencies cited in the denial. If an authority
1065 provides for administrative review of the denial of an
1066 application, the review must be complete and a written decision
1067 issued within 45 days after a written request for review is
1068 made. A denial must identify the specific code provisions on
1069 which the denial is based. If the administrative review is not
1070 complete within 45 days, the authority waives any claim
1071 regarding failure to exhaust administrative remedies in any
1072 judicial review of the denial of an application.
1073 10. An applicant seeking to collocate small wireless
1074 facilities within the jurisdiction of a single authority may, at
1075 the applicant's discretion, file a consolidated application and
Page 43 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1076 receive a single permit for the collocation of up to 30 small
1077 wireless facilities. If the application includes multiple small
1078 wireless facilities, an authority may separately address small
1079 wireless facility collocations for which incomplete information
1080 has been received or which are denied.
1081 11. An authority may deny an application to collocate a
1082 small wireless facility or place a utility pole used to support
1083 a small wireless facility in the public rights-of-way if the
1084 proposed small wireless facility or utility pole used to support
1085 a small wireless facility:
1086 a. Materially interferes with the safe operation of
1087 traffic control equipment.
1088 b. Materially interferes with sight lines or clear zones
1089 for transportation, pedestrians, or public safety purposes.
1090 c. Materially interferes with compliance with the
1091 Americans with Disabilities Act or similar federal or state
1092 standards regarding pedestrian access or movement.
1093 d. Materially fails to comply with the 2017 edition of the
1094 Florida Department of Transportation Utility Accommodation
1095 Manual.
1096 e. Fails to comply with applicable codes.
1097 f. Fails to comply with objective design standards
1098 authorized under paragraph (r).
1099 12. An authority may adopt by ordinance provisions for
1100 insurance coverage, indemnification, force majeure, abandonment,
Page 44 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1101 authority liability, or authority warranties. Such provisions
1102 must be reasonable and nondiscriminatory and apply to all
1103 providers of communications services, including, if applicable,
1104 any local government or nonprofit providers. An authority may
1105 require a construction bond to secure restoration of the
1106 postconstruction rights-of-way to the preconstruction condition.
1107 However, such bond must be time-limited to not more than 18
1108 months after the construction to which the bond applies is
1109 completed and must be reasonably related to the cost to secure
1110 restoration of the rights-of-way. An authority may not limit the
1111 number of permits allowed under this same bond. For any
1112 financial obligation required by an authority allowed under this
1113 section, the authority may not in any way limit the number of
1114 permits issued to a provider, including by project size or by
1115 limiting the number of open permits or applications, provided
1116 that the permit is closed within 45 days after the provider
1117 completes the work, or by imposing additional requirements based
1118 on the scope or linear feet of a project. For any financial
1119 obligation required by an authority allowed under this section,
1120 the authority shall accept, at the option of the applicant, a
1121 bond or a letter of credit or similar financial instrument
1122 issued by any financial institution that is authorized to do
1123 business within the United States, provided that a claim against
1124 the financial instrument may be made by electronic means,
1125 including by facsimile. An authority may not require a deposit
Page 45 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1126 or escrow of cash as a condition of issuing a permit or compel
1127 the applicant to agree to any additional terms or agreements not
1128 specifically authorized by this section nor directly related to
1129 the work specified in the application. A provider of
1130 communications services may add an authority to any existing
1131 bond, insurance policy, or other relevant financial instrument,
1132 and the authority must accept such proof of coverage without any
1133 conditions other than consent to venue for purposes of any
1134 litigation to which the authority is a party. An authority may
1135 not require a communications services provider to indemnify it
1136 for liabilities not caused by the provider or the provider's
1137 agents or employees, including liabilities arising from the
1138 authority's negligence, gross negligence, or willful conduct or
1139 liabilities caused by an unaffiliated third party.
1140 13. Collocation of a small wireless facility on an
1141 authority utility pole does not provide the basis for the
1142 imposition of an ad valorem tax on the authority utility pole.
1143 14. An authority may reserve space on authority utility
1144 poles for future public safety uses. However, a reservation of
1145 space may not preclude collocation of a small wireless facility.
1146 If replacement of the authority utility pole is necessary to
1147 accommodate the collocation of the small wireless facility and
1148 the future public safety use, the pole replacement is subject to
1149 make-ready provisions and the replaced pole shall accommodate
1150 the future public safety use.
Page 46 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1151 15. A structure granted a permit and installed pursuant to
1152 this subsection shall comply with chapter 333 and federal
1153 regulations pertaining to airport airspace protections.
1154 (r) An authority may require wireless providers to comply
1155 with objective design standards adopted by ordinance. The
1156 ordinance may only require:
1157 1. A new utility pole that replaces an existing utility
1158 pole to be of substantially similar design, material, and color;
1159 2. Reasonable spacing requirements concerning the location
1160 of a ground-mounted component of a small wireless facility which
1161 does not exceed 15 feet from the associated support structure;
1162 or
1163 3. A small wireless facility to meet reasonable location
1164 context, color, camouflage, and concealment requirements,
1165 subject to the limitations in this subsection; and
1166 4. A new utility pole used to support a small wireless
1167 facility to meet reasonable location context, color, and
1168 material of the predominant utility pole type at the proposed
1169 location of the new utility pole.
1170
1171 Such design standards under this paragraph may be waived by the
1172 authority upon a showing that the design standards are not
1173 reasonably compatible for the particular location of a small
1174 wireless facility or utility pole or are technically infeasible
1175 or that the design standards impose an excessive expense. The
Page 47 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1176 waiver must be granted or denied within 45 days after the date
1177 of the request. An authority may not require landscaping,
1178 landscaping maintenance, or vegetation management other than
1179 that necessary for right-of-way restoration.
1180 Section 19. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) and paragraph
1181 (d) of subsection (5) of section 339.81, Florida Statutes, are
1182 amended to read:
1183 339.81 Florida Shared-Use Nonmotorized Trail Network.—
1184 (2)
1185 (b) The multiuse trails or shared-use paths of the
1186 statewide network must be physically separated from motor
1187 vehicle traffic and constructed with asphalt, concrete, or
1188 another improved hard surface approved by the department.
1189 (5)
1190 (d) To the greatest extent practicable, the department
1191 shall program projects in the work program to plan for
1192 development of the entire trail and to minimize the creation of
1193 gaps between trail segments. The department shall, at a minimum,
1194 ensure that local support exists for projects and trail
1195 segments, including the availability or dedication of local
1196 funding sources and of contributions by private landowners who
1197 agree to make their land, or property interests in such land,
1198 available for public use as a trail. The department may also
1199 consider any sponsorship agreement entered into pursuant to
1200 subsection (7).
Page 48 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1201 Section 20. Subsection (16) of section 341.041, Florida
1202 Statutes, is amended to read:
1203 341.041 Transit responsibilities of the department.—The
1204 department shall, within the resources provided pursuant to
1205 chapter 216:
1206 (16) Unless otherwise provided by state or federal law,
1207 ensure that all grants and agreements between the department and
1208 entities providing paratransit services to persons with
1209 disabilities include, at a minimum, the following provisions:
1210 (a) Performance requirements for the delivery of services,
1211 including clear penalties for repeated or continuing violations;
1212 (b) Minimum liability insurance requirements for all
1213 transportation services purchased, provided, or coordinated for
1214 the transportation disadvantaged, as defined in s. 427.011(1),
1215 through the contracted vendor or subcontractor thereof;
1216 (c) Complaint and grievance processes for users of
1217 paratransit services for persons with disabilities users,
1218 including a requirement that all reported complaints,
1219 grievances, and resolutions be reported to the department on a
1220 quarterly basis; and
1221 (d) A requirement that the provisions of paragraphs (a),
1222 (b), and (c) must be included in any agreement between an entity
1223 receiving a grant or an agreement from the department and such
1224 entity's contractors or subcontractors that provide paratransit
1225 services for persons with disabilities.
Page 49 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1226 Section 21. Subsections (1), (2), and (3) of section
1227 479.25, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1228 479.25 Erection of noise-attenuation barrier, ramp, or
1229 braided bridge blocking view of sign; procedures; application.—
1230 (1) The owner of a lawfully erected sign that is governed
1231 by and conforms to state and federal requirements for land use,
1232 size, height, and spacing may increase the height above ground
1233 level of such sign at its permitted location if a noise-
1234 attenuation barrier, ramp, or braided bridge is permitted by or
1235 erected by any governmental entity in such a way as to screen or
1236 block visibility of the sign. Any increase in height permitted
1237 under this section may only be the increase in height which is
1238 required to achieve the same degree of visibility from the
1239 right-of-way which the sign had before the construction of the
1240 noise-attenuation barrier, ramp, or braided bridge,
1241 notwithstanding the restrictions contained in s. 479.07(9)(b),
1242 provided that in no event shall the height of the sign exceed
1243 100 feet above the crown of the main traveled way of the road to
1244 which the sign is permitted, regardless of the height of the
1245 visual obstruction. A sign reconstructed under this section must
1246 comply with the building standards and wind load requirements
1247 provided in the Florida Building Code. If construction of a
1248 proposed noise-attenuation barrier, ramp, or braided bridge will
1249 screen a sign lawfully permitted under this chapter, the
1250 department shall provide notice to the local government or local
Page 50 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1251 jurisdiction within which the sign is located before
1252 construction. Upon a determination that an increase in the
1253 height of a sign as permitted under this section will violate an
1254 ordinance or a land development regulation of the local
1255 government or local jurisdiction, the local government or local
1256 jurisdiction shall, before construction:
1257 (a) Provide a variance or waiver to the local ordinance or
1258 land development regulations to allow an increase in the height
1259 of the sign;
1260 (b) Allow the sign to be relocated or reconstructed at
1261 another location if the sign owner agrees; or
1262 (c) Pay the fair market value of the sign and its
1263 associated interest in the real property.
1264 (2) The department shall hold a public hearing within the
1265 boundaries of the affected local governments or local
1266 jurisdictions to receive input on the proposed noise-attenuation
1267 barrier, ramp, or braided bridge and its conflict with the local
1268 ordinance or land development regulation and to suggest or
1269 consider alternatives or modifications to alleviate or minimize
1270 the conflict with the local ordinance or land development
1271 regulation or minimize any costs that may be associated with
1272 relocating, reconstructing, or paying for the affected sign. The
1273 public hearing may be held concurrently with other public
1274 hearings scheduled for the project. The department shall provide
1275 a written notification to the local government or local
Page 51 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1276 jurisdiction of the date and time of the public hearing and
1277 shall provide general notice of the public hearing in accordance
1278 with the notice provisions of s. 335.02(1). The notice may not
1279 be placed in that portion of a newspaper in which legal notices
1280 or classified advertisements appear. The notice must
1281 specifically state that:
1282 (a) Erection of the proposed noise-attenuation barrier,
1283 ramp, or braided bridge may block the visibility of an existing
1284 outdoor advertising sign;
1285 (b) The local government or local jurisdiction may
1286 restrict or prohibit increasing the height of the existing
1287 outdoor advertising sign; and
1288 (c) Upon construction of the noise-attenuation barrier,
1289 ramp, or braided bridge, the local government or local
1290 jurisdiction shall:
1291 1. Allow an increase in the height of the sign through a
1292 waiver or variance to a local ordinance or land development
1293 regulation;
1294 2. Allow the sign to be relocated or reconstructed at
1295 another location if the sign owner agrees; or
1296 3. Pay the fair market value of the sign and its
1297 associated interest in the real property.
1298 (3) The department may not permit erection of the noise-
1299 attenuation barrier, ramp, or braided bridge to the extent the
1300 barrier, ramp, or bridge screens or blocks visibility of the
Page 52 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1301 sign until after the public hearing is held.
1302 Section 22.. Section 790.19, Florida Statutes, is amended
1303 to read:
1304 790.19 Shooting into or throwing deadly missiles into
1305 occupied or unoccupied dwellings, public or private buildings,
1306 occupied or not occupied; vessels, aircraft, public or private
1307 buses, railroad cars, streetcars, or other vehicles.—Any person
1308 who Whoever, wantonly or maliciously, shoots at, within, or
1309 into, or throws any missile or hurls or projects a stone or
1310 other hard substance which would produce death or great bodily
1311 harm, at, within, or into, in any occupied or unoccupied public
1312 or private building; any, occupied or unoccupied, or public or
1313 private bus; or any train, locomotive, railway car, caboose,
1314 cable railway car, street railway car, monorail car, or vehicle
1315 of any kind which is being used or occupied by any person; any
1316 occupied or unoccupied autonomous vehicle;, or any boat, vessel,
1317 ship, or barge lying in or plying the waters of this state;, or
1318 any aircraft flying through the airspace of this state commits
1319 shall be guilty of a felony of the second degree, punishable as
1320 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
1321 Section 23. Subsections (2) through (12) of section
1322 806.13, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3)
1323 through (13), respectively, present subsection (11) is amended,
1324 and a new subsection (2) is added to that section, to read:
1325 806.13 Criminal mischief; penalties; penalty for minor.—
Page 53 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1326 (2) Any person who willfully or maliciously defaces,
1327 injures, or damages by any means any autonomous vehicle, as
1328 defined in s. 316.003(3), commits a felony of the third degree,
1329 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084,
1330 if the damage to the autonomous vehicle is greater than $200.
1331 (12)(11) A minor whose driver license or driving privilege
1332 is revoked, suspended, or withheld under subsection (11) (10)
1333 may elect to reduce the period of revocation, suspension, or
1334 withholding by performing community service at the rate of 1 day
1335 for each hour of community service performed. In addition, if
1336 the court determines that due to a family hardship, the minor's
1337 driver license or driving privilege is necessary for employment
1338 or medical purposes of the minor or a member of the minor's
1339 family, the court shall order the minor to perform community
1340 service and reduce the period of revocation, suspension, or
1341 withholding at the rate of 1 day for each hour of community
1342 service performed. As used in this subsection, the term
1343 "community service" means cleaning graffiti from public
1344 property.
1345 Section 24. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
1346 311.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1347 311.07 Florida seaport transportation and economic
1348 development funding.—
1349 (3)
1350 (b) Projects eligible for funding by grants under the
Page 54 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1351 program are limited to the following port facilities or port
1352 transportation projects:
1353 1. Transportation facilities within the jurisdiction of
1354 the port.
1355 2. The dredging or deepening of channels, turning basins,
1356 or harbors.
1357 3. The construction or rehabilitation of wharves, docks,
1358 structures, jetties, piers, storage facilities, cruise
1359 terminals, automated people mover systems, or any facilities
1360 necessary or useful in connection with any of the foregoing.
1361 4. The acquisition of vessel tracking systems, container
1362 cranes, or other mechanized equipment used in the movement of
1363 cargo or passengers in international commerce.
1364 5. The acquisition of land to be used for port purposes.
1365 6. The acquisition, improvement, enlargement, or extension
1366 of existing port facilities.
1367 7. Environmental protection projects which are necessary
1368 because of requirements imposed by a state agency as a condition
1369 of a permit or other form of state approval; which are necessary
1370 for environmental mitigation required as a condition of a state,
1371 federal, or local environmental permit; which are necessary for
1372 the acquisition of spoil disposal sites and improvements to
1373 existing and future spoil sites; or which result from the
1374 funding of eligible projects listed in this paragraph.
1375 8. Transportation facilities as defined in s. 334.03(31)
Page 55 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1376 s. 334.03(30) which are not otherwise part of the Department of
1377 Transportation's adopted work program.
1378 9. Intermodal access projects.
1379 10. Construction or rehabilitation of port facilities as
1380 defined in s. 315.02, excluding any park or recreational
1381 facilities, in ports listed in s. 311.09(1) with operating
1382 revenues of $5 million or less, provided that such projects
1383 create economic development opportunities, capital improvements,
1384 and positive financial returns to such ports.
1385 11. Seaport master plan or strategic plan development or
1386 updates, including the purchase of data to support such plans.
1387 12. Spaceport or space industry-related planning or
1388 construction of facilities on seaport property which are
1389 necessary or useful for advancing the space industry in this
1390 state and provide an economic benefit to this state.
1391 13. Commercial shipbuilding and manufacturing facilities
1392 on seaport property, if such projects provide an economic
1393 benefit to the community in which the seaport is located.
1394 Section 25. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
1395 316.0777, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1396 316.0777 Automated license plate recognition systems;
1397 installation within rights-of-way of State Highway System;
1398 public records exemption.—
1399 (2)
1400 (b) At the discretion of the Department of Transportation,
Page 56 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1401 an automated license plate recognition system may be installed
1402 within the right-of-way, as defined in s. 334.03(22) s.
1403 334.03(21), of a road on the State Highway System when installed
1404 at the request of a law enforcement agency for the purpose of
1405 collecting active criminal intelligence information or active
1406 criminal investigative information as defined in s. 119.011(3).
1407 An automated license plate recognition system may not be used to
1408 issue a notice of violation for a traffic infraction or a
1409 uniform traffic citation. Such installation must be in
1410 accordance with placement and installation guidelines developed
1411 by the Department of Transportation. An automated license plate
1412 recognition system must be removed within 30 days after the
1413 Department of Transportation notifies the requesting law
1414 enforcement agency that such removal must occur.
1415 Section 26. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
1416 316.306, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1417 316.306 School and work zones; prohibition on the use of a
1418 wireless communications device in a handheld manner.—
1419 (3)(a)1. A person may not operate a motor vehicle while
1420 using a wireless communications device in a handheld manner in a
1421 designated school crossing, school zone, or work zone area as
1422 defined in s. 316.003(113) s. 316.003(112). This subparagraph
1423 shall only be applicable to work zone areas if construction
1424 personnel are present or are operating equipment on the road or
1425 immediately adjacent to the work zone area. For the purposes of
Page 57 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1426 this paragraph, a motor vehicle that is stationary is not being
1427 operated and is not subject to the prohibition in this
1428 paragraph.
1429 2. Effective January 1, 2020, a law enforcement officer
1430 may stop motor vehicles and issue citations to persons who are
1431 driving while using a wireless communications device in a
1432 handheld manner in violation of subparagraph 1.
1433 Section 27. Paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of section
1434 316.515, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1435 316.515 Maximum width, height, length.—
1436 (5) IMPLEMENTS OF HUSBANDRY AND FARM EQUIPMENT;
1437 AGRICULTURAL TRAILERS; FORESTRY EQUIPMENT; SAFETY REQUIREMENTS.—
1438 (c) The width and height limitations of this section do
1439 not apply to farming or agricultural equipment, whether self-
1440 propelled, pulled, or hauled, when temporarily operated during
1441 daylight hours upon a public road that is not a limited access
1442 facility as defined in s. 334.03(13) s. 334.03(12), and the
1443 width and height limitations may be exceeded by such equipment
1444 without a permit. To be eligible for this exemption, the
1445 equipment shall be operated within a radius of 50 miles of the
1446 real property owned, rented, managed, harvested, or leased by
1447 the equipment owner. However, equipment being delivered by a
1448 dealer to a purchaser is not subject to the 50-mile limitation.
1449 Farming or agricultural equipment greater than 174 inches in
1450 width must have one warning lamp mounted on each side of the
Page 58 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1451 equipment to denote the width and must have a slow-moving
1452 vehicle sign. Warning lamps required by this paragraph must be
1453 visible from the front and rear of the vehicle and must be
1454 visible from a distance of at least 1,000 feet.
1455 Section 28. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of
1456 section 320.04, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1457 320.04 Registration service charge.—
1458 (1)(a) A service charge of $2.50 shall be imposed on each
1459 application that is handled in connection with original
1460 issuance, duplicate issuance, or transfer of a license plate or,
1461 mobile home sticker, or validation sticker or with transfer or
1462 duplicate issuance of a registration certificate. This service
1463 charge shall be retained by the department or by the tax
1464 collector, as the case may be, as other fees accruing to those
1465 offices.
1466 (b) A service charge of $1 shall also be imposed for the
1467 issuance of each license plate validation sticker, vessel decal,
1468 and mobile home sticker issued from an automated vending
1469 facility or printer dispenser machine. This service charge is
1470 payable to the department and shall be used to provide for
1471 automated vending facilities or printer dispenser machines that
1472 are used to dispense such stickers and decals by each tax
1473 collector's or license tag agent's employee.
1474 Section 29. Section 320.08035, Florida Statutes, is
1475 amended to read:
Page 59 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1476 320.08035 Persons who have disabilities; reduced dimension
1477 license plate.—The owner or lessee of a motorcycle, moped, or
1478 motorized disability access vehicle who resides in this state
1479 and qualifies for a parking permit for a person who has a
1480 disability under s. 320.0848, upon application and payment of
1481 the appropriate license tax and fees under s. 320.08(1), must be
1482 issued a license plate that has reduced dimensions as provided
1483 under s. 320.06(2)(a) s. 320.06(3)(a). The plate must be stamped
1484 with the international symbol of accessibility after the numeric
1485 and alpha serial number of the license plate. The plate entitles
1486 the person to all privileges afforded by a disabled parking
1487 permit issued under s. 320.0848.
1488 Section 30. Subsection (4) of section 320.0807, Florida
1489 Statutes, is amended to read:
1490 320.0807 Special license plates for Governor and federal
1491 and state legislators.—
1492 (4) License plates purchased under subsection (1),
1493 subsection (2), or subsection (3) shall be replaced by the
1494 department at no cost, other than the fees required under ss.
1495 320.04 and 320.06(2)(b) 320.06(3)(b), when the person to whom
1496 the plates have been issued leaves the elective office with
1497 respect to which the license plates were issued. Within 30 days
1498 after leaving office, the person to whom the license plates have
1499 been issued must apply to the department for a replacement
1500 license plate. The person may return the prestige license plates
Page 60 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1501 to the department or retain the plates as souvenirs. Upon
1502 receipt of the replacement license plate, the person may not
1503 display on any vehicle the prestige license plate or plates
1504 issued with respect to his or her former office.
1505 Section 31. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
1506 320.084, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1507 320.084 Free motor vehicle license plate to certain
1508 disabled veterans.—
1509 (4)
1510 (b) There shall be a service charge in accordance with the
1511 provisions of s. 320.04 for each initial application or renewal
1512 of registration and an additional sum of 50 cents on each
1513 license plate and validation sticker as provided in s.
1514 320.06(2)(b) s. 320.06(3)(b).
1515 Section 32. Section 320.102, Florida Statutes, is amended
1516 to read:
1517 320.102 Marine boat trailers owned by nonprofit
1518 organizations; exemptions.—The registration or renewal of a
1519 registration of any marine boat trailer owned and operated by a
1520 nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income tax
1521 under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and which is
1522 used exclusively in carrying out its customary nonprofit
1523 activities is exempt from paying the fees, taxes, surcharges,
1524 and charges in ss. 320.03(5), (6), and (9), 320.031(2),
1525 320.04(1), 320.06(1)(b) and (2)(b) (3)(b), 320.0801, 320.0802,
Page 61 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1526 320.0804, and 320.08046.
1527 Section 33. Section 336.01, Florida Statutes, is amended
1528 to read:
1529 336.01 Designation of county road system.—The county road
1530 system shall be as defined in s. 334.03(9) s. 334.03(8).
1531 Section 34. Subsection (2) of section 338.222, Florida
1532 Statutes, is amended to read:
1533 338.222 Department of Transportation sole governmental
1534 entity to acquire, construct, or operate turnpike projects;
1535 exception.—
1536 (2) The department may, but is not required to, contract
1537 with any local governmental entity as defined in s. 334.03(14)
1538 s. 334.03(13) for the design, right-of-way acquisition,
1539 transfer, purchase, sale, acquisition, or other conveyance of
1540 the ownership, operation, maintenance, or construction of any
1541 turnpike project which the Legislature has approved. Local
1542 governmental entities may negotiate and contract with the
1543 department for the design, right-of-way acquisition, transfer,
1544 purchase, sale, acquisition, or other conveyance of the
1545 ownership, operation, maintenance, or construction of any
1546 section of the turnpike project within areas of their respective
1547 jurisdictions or within counties with which they have interlocal
1548 agreements.
1549 Section 35. Subsection (2) of section 341.8225, Florida
1550 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 62 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1551 341.8225 Department of Transportation sole governmental
1552 entity to acquire, construct, or operate high-speed rail
1553 projects; exception.—
1554 (2) Local governmental entities, as defined in s.
1555 334.03(14) s. 334.03(13), may negotiate with the department for
1556 the design, right-of-way acquisition, and construction of any
1557 component of the high-speed rail system within areas of their
1558 respective jurisdictions or within counties with which they have
1559 interlocal agreements.
1560 Section 36. Paragraph (b) of subsection (12) of section
1561 376.3071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1562 376.3071 Inland Protection Trust Fund; creation; purposes;
1563 funding.—
1564 (12) SITE CLEANUP.—
1565 (b) Low-scored site initiative.—Notwithstanding
1566 subsections (5) and (6), a site with a priority ranking score of
1567 29 points or less may voluntarily participate in the low-scored
1568 site initiative regardless of whether the site is eligible for
1569 state restoration funding.
1570 1. To participate in the low-scored site initiative, the
1571 property owner, or a responsible party who provides evidence of
1572 authorization from the property owner, must submit a "No Further
1573 Action" proposal and affirmatively demonstrate that the
1574 conditions imposed under subparagraph 4. are met.
1575 2. Upon affirmative demonstration that the conditions
Page 63 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1576 imposed under subparagraph 4. are met, the department shall
1577 issue a site rehabilitation completion order incorporating the
1578 "No Further Action" proposal submitted by the property owner or
1579 the responsible party, who must provide evidence of
1580 authorization from the property owner. If no contamination is
1581 detected, the department may issue a site rehabilitation
1582 completion order.
1583 3. Sites that are eligible for state restoration funding
1584 may receive payment of costs for the low-scored site initiative
1585 as follows:
1586 a. A property owner, or a responsible party who provides
1587 evidence of authorization from the property owner, may submit an
1588 assessment and limited remediation plan designed to
1589 affirmatively demonstrate that the site meets the conditions
1590 imposed under subparagraph 4. Notwithstanding the priority
1591 ranking score of the site, the department may approve the cost
1592 of the assessment and limited remediation, including up to 12
1593 months of groundwater monitoring and 12 months of limited
1594 remediation activities in one or more task assignments or
1595 modifications thereof, not to exceed the threshold amount
1596 provided in s. 287.017 for CATEGORY TWO, for each site where the
1597 department has determined that the assessment and limited
1598 remediation, if applicable, will likely result in a
1599 determination of "No Further Action." The department may not pay
1600 the costs associated with the establishment of institutional or
Page 64 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1601 engineering controls other than the costs associated with a
1602 professional land survey or a specific purpose survey, if such
1603 is needed, and the costs associated with obtaining a title
1604 report and paying recording fees.
1605 b. After the approval of initial site assessment results
1606 provided pursuant to state funding under sub-subparagraph a.,
1607 the department may approve an additional amount not to exceed
1608 the threshold amount provided in s. 287.017 for CATEGORY TWO for
1609 limited remediation needed to achieve a determination of "No
1610 Further Action."
1611 c. The assessment and limited remediation work shall be
1612 completed no later than 15 months after the department
1613 authorizes the start of a state-funded, low-score site
1614 initiative task. If groundwater monitoring is required after the
1615 assessment and limited remediation in order to satisfy the
1616 conditions under subparagraph 4., the department may authorize
1617 an additional 12 months to complete the monitoring.
1618 d. No more than $15 million for the low-scored site
1619 initiative may be encumbered from the fund in any fiscal year.
1620 Funds shall be made available on a first-come, first-served
1621 basis and shall be limited to 10 sites in each fiscal year for
1622 each property owner or each responsible party who provides
1623 evidence of authorization from the property owner.
1624 e. Program deductibles, copayments, and the limited
1625 contamination assessment report requirements under paragraph
Page 65 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1626 (13)(d) do not apply to expenditures under this paragraph.
1627 4. The department shall issue an order incorporating the
1628 "No Further Action" proposal submitted by a property owner or a
1629 responsible party who provides evidence of authorization from
1630 the property owner upon affirmative demonstration that all of
1631 the following conditions are met:
1632 a. Soil saturated with petroleum or petroleum products, or
1633 soil that causes a total corrected hydrocarbon measurement of
1634 500 parts per million or higher for the Gasoline Analytical
1635 Group or 50 parts per million or higher for the Kerosene
1636 Analytical Group, as defined by department rule, does not exist
1637 onsite as a result of a release of petroleum products.
1638 b. A minimum of 12 months of groundwater monitoring
1639 indicates that the plume is shrinking or stable.
1640 c. The release of petroleum products at the site does not
1641 adversely affect adjacent surface waters, including their
1642 effects on human health and the environment.
1643 d. The area containing the petroleum products' chemicals
1644 of concern:
1645 (I) Is confined to the source property boundaries of the
1646 real property on which the discharge originated, unless the
1647 property owner has requested or authorized a more limited area
1648 in the "No Further Action" proposal submitted under this
1649 subsection; or
1650 (II) Has migrated from the source property onto or beneath
Page 66 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1651 a transportation facility as defined in s. 334.03(31) s.
1652 334.03(30) for which the department has approved, and the
1653 governmental entity owning the transportation facility has
1654 agreed to institutional controls as defined in s. 376.301(21).
1655 This sub-sub-subparagraph does not, however, impose any legal
1656 liability on the transportation facility owner, obligate such
1657 owner to engage in remediation, or waive such owner's right to
1658 recover costs for damages.
1659 e. The groundwater contamination containing the petroleum
1660 products' chemicals of concern is not a threat to any permitted
1661 potable water supply well.
1662 f. Soils onsite found between land surface and 2 feet
1663 below land surface which are subject to human exposure meet the
1664 soil cleanup target levels established in subparagraph (5)(b)9.,
1665 or human exposure is limited by appropriate institutional or
1666 engineering controls.
1667
1668 Issuance of a site rehabilitation completion order under this
1669 paragraph acknowledges that minimal contamination exists onsite
1670 and that such contamination is not a threat to the public
1671 health, safety, or welfare; water resources; or the environment.
1672 Pursuant to subsection (4), the issuance of the site
1673 rehabilitation completion order, with or without conditions,
1674 does not alter eligibility for state-funded rehabilitation that
1675 would otherwise be applicable under this section.
Page 67 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1676 Section 37. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
1677 403.7211, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1678 403.7211 Hazardous waste facilities managing hazardous
1679 wastes generated offsite; federal facilities managing hazardous
1680 waste.—
1681 (2) The department may not issue any permit under s.
1682 403.722 for the construction, initial operation, or substantial
1683 modification of a facility for the disposal, storage, or
1684 treatment of hazardous waste generated offsite which is proposed
1685 to be located in any of the following locations:
1686 (a) Any area where life-threatening concentrations of
1687 hazardous substances could accumulate at any residence or
1688 residential subdivision as the result of a catastrophic event at
1689 the proposed facility, unless each such residence or residential
1690 subdivision is served by at least one arterial road or urban
1691 minor arterial road, as determined under the procedures
1692 referenced in s. 334.03(11) s. 334.03(10), which provides safe
1693 and direct egress by land to an area where such life-threatening
1694 concentrations of hazardous substances could not accumulate in a
1695 catastrophic event. Egress by any road leading from any
1696 residence or residential subdivision to any point located within
1697 1,000 yards of the proposed facility is unsafe for the purposes
1698 of this paragraph. In determining whether egress proposed by the
1699 applicant is safe and direct, the department shall also
1700 consider, at a minimum, the following factors:
Page 68 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1701 1. Natural barriers such as water bodies, and whether any
1702 road in the proposed evacuation route is impaired by a natural
1703 barrier such as a water body.
1704 2. Potential exposure during egress and potential
1705 increases in the duration of exposure.
1706 3. Whether any road in a proposed evacuation route passes
1707 in close proximity to the facility.
1708 4. Whether any portion of the evacuation route is
1709 inherently directed toward the facility.
1710
1711 For the purposes of this subsection, all distances shall be
1712 measured from the outer limit of the active hazardous waste
1713 management area. "Substantial modification" includes: any
1714 physical change in, change in the operations of, or addition to
1715 a facility which could increase the potential offsite impact, or
1716 risk of impact, from a release at that facility; and any change
1717 in permit conditions which is reasonably expected to lead to
1718 greater potential impacts or risks of impacts, from a release at
1719 that facility. "Substantial modification" does not include a
1720 change in operations, structures, or permit conditions which
1721 does not substantially increase either the potential impact
1722 from, or the risk of, a release. Physical or operational changes
1723 to a facility related solely to the management of nonhazardous
1724 waste at the facility is not considered a substantial
1725 modification. The department shall, by rule, adopt criteria to
Page 69 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1726 determine whether a facility has been substantially modified.
1727 "Initial operation" means the initial commencement of operations
1728 at the facility.
1729 Section 38. Subsection (5) of section 479.261, Florida
1730 Statutes, is amended to read:
1731 479.261 Logo sign program.—
1732 (5) At a minimum, permit fees for businesses that
1733 participate in the program must be established in an amount
1734 sufficient to offset the total cost to the department for the
1735 program, including contract costs. The department shall provide
1736 the services in the most efficient and cost-effective manner
1737 through department staff or by contracting for some or all of
1738 the services. The department shall adopt rules that set
1739 reasonable rates based upon factors such as population, traffic
1740 volume, market demand, and costs for annual permit fees.
1741 However, annual permit fees for sign locations inside an urban
1742 area, as defined in s. 334.03(32) s. 334.03(31), may not exceed
1743 $3,500, and annual permit fees for sign locations outside an
1744 urban area, as defined in s. 334.03(32) s. 334.03(31), may not
1745 exceed $2,000. After recovering program costs, the proceeds from
1746 the annual permit fees shall be deposited into the State
1747 Transportation Trust Fund and used for transportation purposes.
1748 Section 39. Subsection (1) of section 655.960, Florida
1749 Statutes, is amended to read:
1750 655.960 Definitions; ss. 655.960-655.965.—As used in this
Page 70 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1751 section and ss. 655.961-655.965, unless the context otherwise
1752 requires:
1753 (1) "Access area" means any paved walkway or sidewalk
1754 which is within 50 feet of any automated teller machine. The
1755 term does not include any street or highway open to the use of
1756 the public, as defined in s. 316.003 (91)(a) or (b) s.
1757 316.003(90)(a) or (b), including any adjacent sidewalk, as
1758 defined in s. 316.003.
1759 Section 40. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
1760 715.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1761 715.07 Vehicles or vessels parked on private property;
1762 towing.—
1763 (2) The owner or lessee of real property, or any person
1764 authorized by the owner or lessee, which person may be the
1765 designated representative of the condominium association if the
1766 real property is a condominium, may cause any vehicle or vessel
1767 parked on such property without her or his permission to be
1768 removed by a person regularly engaged in the business of towing
1769 vehicles or vessels, without liability for the costs of removal,
1770 transportation, or storage or damages caused by such removal,
1771 transportation, or storage, under any of the following
1772 circumstances:
1773 (a) The towing or removal of any vehicle or vessel from
1774 private property without the consent of the registered owner or
1775 other legally authorized person in control of that vehicle or
Page 71 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1776 vessel is subject to substantial compliance with the following
1777 conditions and restrictions:
1778 1.a. Any towed or removed vehicle or vessel must be stored
1779 at a site within a 10-mile radius of the point of removal in any
1780 county of 500,000 population or more, and within a 15-mile
1781 radius of the point of removal in any county of fewer than
1782 500,000 population. That site must be open for the purpose of
1783 redemption of vehicles on any day that the person or firm towing
1784 such vehicle or vessel is open for towing purposes, from 8:00
1785 a.m. to 6:00 p.m., and, when closed, shall have prominently
1786 posted a sign indicating a telephone number where the operator
1787 of the site can be reached at all times. Upon receipt of a
1788 telephoned request to open the site to redeem a vehicle or
1789 vessel, the operator shall return to the site within 1 hour or
1790 she or he will be in violation of this section.
1791 b. If no towing business providing such service is located
1792 within the area of towing limitations set forth in sub-
1793 subparagraph a., the following limitations apply: any towed or
1794 removed vehicle or vessel must be stored at a site within a 20-
1795 mile radius of the point of removal in any county of 500,000
1796 population or more, and within a 30-mile radius of the point of
1797 removal in any county of fewer than 500,000 population.
1798 2. The person or firm towing or removing the vehicle or
1799 vessel shall, within 30 minutes after completion of such towing
1800 or removal, notify the municipal police department or, in an
Page 72 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1801 unincorporated area, the sheriff, of such towing or removal, the
1802 storage site, the time the vehicle or vessel was towed or
1803 removed, and the make, model, color, and license plate number of
1804 the vehicle or description and registration number of the vessel
1805 and shall obtain the name of the person at that department to
1806 whom such information was reported and note that name on the
1807 trip record.
1808 3. A person in the process of towing or removing a vehicle
1809 or vessel from the premises or parking lot in which the vehicle
1810 or vessel is not lawfully parked must stop when a person seeks
1811 the return of the vehicle or vessel. The vehicle or vessel must
1812 be returned upon the payment of a reasonable service fee of not
1813 more than one-half of the posted rate for the towing or removal
1814 service as provided in subparagraph 6. The vehicle or vessel may
1815 be towed or removed if, after a reasonable opportunity, the
1816 owner or legally authorized person in control of the vehicle or
1817 vessel is unable to pay the service fee. If the vehicle or
1818 vessel is redeemed, a detailed signed receipt must be given to
1819 the person redeeming the vehicle or vessel.
1820 4. A person may not pay or accept money or other valuable
1821 consideration for the privilege of towing or removing vehicles
1822 or vessels from a particular location.
1823 5. Except for property appurtenant to and obviously a part
1824 of a single-family residence, and except for instances when
1825 notice is personally given to the owner or other legally
Page 73 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1826 authorized person in control of the vehicle or vessel that the
1827 area in which that vehicle or vessel is parked is reserved or
1828 otherwise unavailable for unauthorized vehicles or vessels and
1829 that the vehicle or vessel is subject to being removed at the
1830 owner's or operator's expense, any property owner or lessee, or
1831 person authorized by the property owner or lessee, before towing
1832 or removing any vehicle or vessel from private property without
1833 the consent of the owner or other legally authorized person in
1834 control of that vehicle or vessel, must post a notice meeting
1835 the following requirements:
1836 a. The notice must be prominently placed at each driveway
1837 access or curb cut allowing vehicular access to the property
1838 within 10 feet from the road, as defined in s. 334.03(23) s.
1839 334.03(22). If there are no curbs or access barriers, the signs
1840 must be posted not fewer than one sign for each 25 feet of lot
1841 frontage.
1842 b. The notice must clearly indicate, in not fewer than 2-
1843 inch high, light-reflective letters on a contrasting background,
1844 that unauthorized vehicles will be towed away at the owner's
1845 expense. The words "tow-away zone" must be included on the sign
1846 in not fewer than 4-inch high letters.
1847 c. The notice must also provide the name and current
1848 telephone number of the person or firm towing or removing the
1849 vehicles or vessels.
1850 d. The sign structure containing the required notices must
Page 74 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1851 be permanently installed with the words "tow-away zone" not
1852 fewer than 3 feet and not more than 6 feet above ground level
1853 and must be continuously maintained on the property for not
1854 fewer than 24 hours before the towing or removal of any vehicles
1855 or vessels.
1856 e. The local government may require permitting and
1857 inspection of these signs before any towing or removal of
1858 vehicles or vessels being authorized.
1859 f. A business with 20 or fewer parking spaces satisfies
1860 the notice requirements of this subparagraph by prominently
1861 displaying a sign stating "Reserved Parking for Customers Only
1862 Unauthorized Vehicles or Vessels Will be Towed Away At the
1863 Owner's Expense" in not fewer than 4-inch high, light-reflective
1864 letters on a contrasting background.
1865 g. A property owner towing or removing vessels from real
1866 property must post notice, consistent with the requirements in
1867 sub-subparagraphs a.-f., which apply to vehicles, that
1868 unauthorized vehicles or vessels will be towed away at the
1869 owner's expense.
1870
1871 A business owner or lessee may authorize the removal of a
1872 vehicle or vessel by a towing company when the vehicle or vessel
1873 is parked in such a manner that restricts the normal operation
1874 of business; and if a vehicle or vessel parked on a public
1875 right-of-way obstructs access to a private driveway the owner,
Page 75 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1876 lessee, or agent may have the vehicle or vessel removed by a
1877 towing company upon signing an order that the vehicle or vessel
1878 be removed without a posted tow-away zone sign.
1879 6. Any person or firm that tows or removes vehicles or
1880 vessels and proposes to require an owner, operator, or person in
1881 control or custody of a vehicle or vessel to pay the costs of
1882 towing and storage before redemption of the vehicle or vessel
1883 must file and keep on record with the local law enforcement
1884 agency a complete copy of the current rates to be charged for
1885 such services and post at the storage site an identical rate
1886 schedule and any written contracts with property owners,
1887 lessees, or persons in control of property which authorize such
1888 person or firm to remove vehicles or vessels as provided in this
1889 section.
1890 7. Any person or firm towing or removing any vehicles or
1891 vessels from private property without the consent of the owner
1892 or other legally authorized person in control or custody of the
1893 vehicles or vessels shall, on any trucks, wreckers as defined in
1894 s. 713.78(1), or other vehicles used in the towing or removal,
1895 have the name, address, and telephone number of the company
1896 performing such service clearly printed in contrasting colors on
1897 the driver and passenger sides of the vehicle. The name shall be
1898 in at least 3-inch permanently affixed letters, and the address
1899 and telephone number shall be in at least 1-inch permanently
1900 affixed letters.
Page 76 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1901 8. Vehicle entry for the purpose of removing the vehicle
1902 or vessel shall be allowed with reasonable care on the part of
1903 the person or firm towing the vehicle or vessel. Such person or
1904 firm shall be liable for any damage occasioned to the vehicle or
1905 vessel if such entry is not in accordance with the standard of
1906 reasonable care.
1907 9. When a vehicle or vessel has been towed or removed
1908 pursuant to this section, it must be released to its owner or
1909 person in control or custody within 1 hour after requested. Any
1910 vehicle or vessel owner or person in control or custody has the
1911 right to inspect the vehicle or vessel before accepting its
1912 return, and no release or waiver of any kind which would release
1913 the person or firm towing the vehicle or vessel from liability
1914 for damages noted by the owner or person in control or custody
1915 at the time of the redemption may be required from any vehicle
1916 or vessel owner or person in control or custody as a condition
1917 of release of the vehicle or vessel to its owner or person in
1918 control or custody. A detailed receipt showing the legal name of
1919 the company or person towing or removing the vehicle or vessel
1920 must be given to the person paying towing or storage charges at
1921 the time of payment, whether requested or not.
1922 Section 41. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
1923 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1924 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
1925 ranking chart.—
Page 77 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1926 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
1927 (b) LEVEL 2
1928
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
1929
365.172 3rd Misuse of emergency
(14)(b)1. communications system causing
great bodily harm, permanent
disfigurement, or permanent
disability.
1930
379.2431 3rd Possession of 11 or fewer
(1)(e)3. marine turtle eggs in violation
of the Marine Turtle Protection
Act.
1931
379.2431 3rd Possession of more than 11
(1)(e)4. marine turtle eggs in violation
of the Marine Turtle Protection
Act.
1932
403.413(6)(c) 3rd Dumps waste litter exceeding
500 lbs. in weight or 100 cubic
feet in volume or any quantity
Page 78 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
for commercial purposes, or
hazardous waste.
1933
517.07(2) 3rd Failure to furnish a prospectus
meeting requirements.
1934
590.28(1) 3rd Intentional burning of lands.
1935
784.03(3) 3rd Battery during a riot or an
aggravated riot.
1936
784.05(3) 3rd Storing or leaving a loaded
firearm within reach of minor
who uses it to inflict injury
or death.
1937
787.04(1) 3rd In violation of court order,
take, entice, etc., minor
beyond state limits.
1938
806.13(1)(b)3. 3rd Criminal mischief; damage
$1,000 or more to public
communication or any other
public service.
1939
Page 79 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
806.13(4) 3rd Criminal mischief; damage of
806.13(3) $200 or more to a memorial or
historic property.
1940
810.061(2) 3rd Impairing or impeding telephone
or power to a dwelling;
facilitating or furthering
burglary.
1941
810.09(2)(d) 3rd Trespassing on posted
commercial horticulture
property.
1942
812.014(2)(c)1. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree; $750
or more but less than $5,000.
1943
812.014(2)(d)1. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree; $40 or
more but less than $750, taken
from dwelling or its unenclosed
curtilage.
1944
812.014(2)(e)2. 3rd Petit theft, 1st degree; less
than $40 taken from dwelling or
its unenclosed curtilage with
one prior theft conviction.
Page 80 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1945
812.015(7) 3rd Possession, use, or attempted
use of an antishoplifting or
inventory control device
countermeasure.
1946
817.234(1)(a)2. 3rd False statement in support of
insurance claim.
1947
817.481(3)(a) 3rd Obtain credit or purchase with
false, expired, counterfeit,
etc., credit card, value over
$300.
1948
817.52(3) 3rd Failure to redeliver hired
vehicle.
1949
817.54 3rd With intent to defraud, obtain
mortgage note, etc., by false
representation.
1950
817.60(5) 3rd Dealing in credit cards of
another.
1951
817.60(6)(a) 3rd Forgery; purchase goods,
Page 81 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
services with false card.
1952
817.61 3rd Fraudulent use of credit cards
over $100 or more within 6
months.
1953
826.04 3rd Knowingly marries or has sexual
intercourse with person to whom
related.
1954
831.01 3rd Forgery.
1955
831.02 3rd Uttering forged instrument;
utters or publishes alteration
with intent to defraud.
1956
831.07 3rd Forging bank bills, checks,
drafts, or promissory notes.
1957
831.08 3rd Possessing 10 or more forged
notes, bills, checks, or
drafts.
1958
831.09 3rd Uttering forged notes, bills,
checks, drafts, or promissory
Page 82 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
notes.
1959
831.11 3rd Bringing into the state forged
bank bills, checks, drafts, or
notes.
1960
832.05(3)(a) 3rd Cashing or depositing item with
intent to defraud.
1961
836.13(3) 3rd Soliciting an altered sexual
depiction of an identifiable
person without consent.
1962
843.01(2) 3rd Resist police canine or police
horse with violence; under
certain circumstances.
1963
843.08 3rd False personation.
1964
843.19(3) 3rd Touch or strike police, fire,
SAR canine or police horse.
1965
893.13(2)(a)2. 3rd Purchase of any s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
Page 83 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs
other than cannabis.
1966
893.147(2) 3rd Manufacture or delivery of drug
paraphernalia.
1967
1968 Section 42. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
1969 1006.23, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1970 1006.23 Hazardous walking conditions.—
1971 (2) HAZARDOUS WALKING CONDITIONS.—
1972 (a) Walkways parallel to the road.—
1973 1. It shall be considered a hazardous walking condition
1974 with respect to any road along which students must walk in order
1975 to walk to and from school if there is not an area at least 4
1976 feet wide adjacent to the road, not including drainage ditches,
1977 sluiceways, swales, or channels, having a surface upon which
1978 students may walk without being required to walk on the road
1979 surface or if the walkway is along a limited access facility as
1980 defined in s. 334.03(13) s. 334.03(12). In addition, whenever
1981 the road along which students must walk is uncurbed and has a
1982 posted speed limit of 50 miles per hour or greater, the area as
1983 described above for students to walk upon shall be set off the
1984 road by no less than 3 feet from the edge of the road.
1985 2. Subparagraph 1. does not apply when the road along
Page 84 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1233 2026
1986 which students must walk:
1987 a. Is a road on which the volume of traffic is less than
1988 180 vehicles per hour, per direction, during the time students
1989 walk to and from school; or
1990 b. Is located in a residential area and has a posted speed
1991 limit of 30 miles per hour or less.
1992 Section 43. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 85 of 85
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1233-02-c2